Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 12 Contractors’ Bonds

37-12-1.
Contractors required to give bond — Terms and conditions.

Every person (which word for the purposes of this chapter shall include a copartnership, a number of persons engaged in a joint enterprise, or a corporation), before being awarded a contract by the department of transportation or by the department of administration, as the case may be, and every person awarded such a contract as a general contractor or construction or project manager for the construction, improvement, completion, or repair of any public road or portion thereof or of any bridge in which the contract price shall be in excess of one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), or for a contract for the construction, improvement, completion, or repair of any public building, or portion thereof, shall be required to furnish to the respective department a bond of that person to the state, with good and sufficient surety or sureties (hereafter in this chapter referred to as surety), acceptable to the respective department, in a sum not less than fifty percent (50%) and not more than one hundred percent (100%) of the contract price, conditioned that the contractor, principal in the bond, the person’s executors, administrators, or successors, shall in all things, well and truly keep and perform the covenants, conditions, and agreements in the contract, and in any alterations thereof made as therein provided, on the person’s part to be kept and performed, at the time and in the manner therein specified, and in all respects according to their true intent and meaning, and shall indemnify and save harmless the state, the respective department, and all of its officers, agents, and employees, as therein stipulated, and shall also promptly pay for all such labor performed or furnished, together with penalties assessed pursuant to §

37-13-14.1(b)

, and for all such materials and equipment furnished (which, as to equipment, shall mean payment of the reasonable rental value, as determined by the respective department, of its use during the period of its use), as shall be used in the carrying on of the work covered by the contract, or shall see that they are promptly paid for, whether or not the labor is directly performed for or furnished to the contractor or is even directly performed upon the work covered by the contract, and whether or not the materials are furnished to the contractor or become component parts of the work, and whether or not the equipment is furnished to the contractor or even directly used upon the work. The bond shall contain the provisions that it is subject to all such rights and powers of the respective department and such other provisions as are set forth in the contract and the plans, specifications, and proposal incorporated by reference in the contract, and that no extension of the time of performance of the contract or delay in the completion of the work thereunder or any alterations thereof, made as therein provided, shall invalidate the bond or release the liability of the surety thereunder. Waiver of the bonding requirements of this section is expressly prohibited.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2644, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-1

; P.L. 1988, ch. 449, § 15; P.L. 1994, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 367, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 354, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 537, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 72, § 1.

37-12-2.
Rights of persons furnishing labor and materials.

Every person who shall have performed labor and every person who shall have furnished or supplied labor, material, or equipment in the prosecution of the work provided for in the contract, in respect of which a payment bond is furnished under §

37-12-1

, and who has not been paid in full therefor before the expiration of a period of ninety (90) days after the day on which the last of the labor was performed or furnished by him or her, or material or equipment furnished or supplied by him or her for which a claim is made, shall have the right to sue on the payment bond for the amount, or the balance thereof, unpaid at the time of institution of the suit and to prosecute the action to final execution and judgment for the sum or sums justly due him or her; provided, however, that any person having direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor but no contractual relationship express or implied with the contractor furnishing the payment bond shall have a right of action upon the payment bond upon giving written notice to the contractor within ninety (90) days from the date on which the person furnished or performed the last of the labor, or furnished or supplied the last of the material or equipment for which the claim is made, stating with substantial accuracy the amount claimed and the name of the party to whom the labor was furnished or performed or the material or equipment was furnished or supplied. The notice shall be served by mailing the same by certified mail, postage prepaid, in an envelope addressed to the contractor at any place he or she maintains an office, conducts his or her business, or his or her residence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 2; P.L. 1938, ch. 2644, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-2

; P.L. 1973, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 148, § 1.

37-12-3.
Remedies of creditors and state — Priority of claims.

The remedy on the bond shall be by a civil action brought in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol and in any suit brought on the bond the rights of the state shall be prior to those of all creditors. These rights shall include penalties, assessed under §

37-13-14.1(b)

for nonpayment or late payment of wages due. The rights of persons who shall have performed labor as aforesaid shall be prior to the rights of all other creditors, and there shall be no priorities among laborers or among other creditors under the bond. The state, either after having recovered a judgment against the contractor on the contract or without having recovered a judgment, may bring a suit on the bond against the contractor and surety on the bond, and may join as parties defendant in the suit any persons claiming to have rights under the bond as creditors; and, if it has not brought such a suit, it may at any time before a final and conclusive decree, intervene and become a party in any suit brought, as hereafter provided in this chapter, by any person claiming to be a creditor under the bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-3

; P.L. 2016, ch. 537, § 1.

37-12-4.
Intervention by creditor in suit brought by state.

Any person claiming to be a creditor under the bond may at any time intervene and become a party in any pending suit brought as aforesaid by the state on the bond, and by so intervening may have the rights to the person adjudicated in the suit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 4; P.L. 1938, ch. 2644, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-4

; P.L. 1973, ch. 216, § 1.

37-12-5.
Time limitation on creditors’ actions.

No suit instituted under §

37-12-2

shall be commenced after the expiration of two (2) years, or under the maximum time limit as contained within any labor or material payment bond required under §

37-12-1

, whichever period is longer, after the day on which the last of the labor was furnished or performed or material or equipment was furnished or supplied by any person claiming under the section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 5; P.L. 1938, ch. 2644, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-5

; P.L. 1973, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 148, § 1.

37-12-6.
Intervention in suit brought by creditor — Consolidation of suits.

When a suit has been so brought on the bond by a person claiming to be a creditor under the bond and is pending, any other person claiming to be a creditor under the bond may intervene and become a party in the first suit thus brought and pending and by so intervening may have the rights of the other person adjudicated in the suit. If two (2) or more of the suits be filed in the court on the same day, the one in which the larger sum shall be claimed shall be regarded as the earlier suit. All suits brought upon the bond as provided in this chapter shall be consolidated together by the court and heard as one suit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 6; P.L. 1938, ch. 2644, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-6

; P.L. 1973, ch. 216, § 1.

37-12-7.
Notice of pendency of suit.

In any suit brought under the provisions of this chapter such personal notice of the pendency of the suit as the court may order shall be given to all such known creditors and persons claiming to be creditors under the bond as shall not have entered their appearances in the suit and, in addition to the notice, notice of the pendency of the suit shall be given by publication in some newspaper published in this state of general circulation in the city or town or every city or town in which the work covered by the contract was carried on, once a week for three (3) successive weeks, in such form as the court may order. The court, however, may dispense with the notices if satisfied that sufficient notices shall have been given in some other suit brought under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-7

.

37-12-8.
Certified copies of documents.

Any person claiming to be a creditor under the bond and having filed a claim with the respective department, in accordance with the requirements of §

37-12-2

, shall have the right, at any time when the person could under this chapter file a suit or intervene in a pending suit, to require the respective department to furnish to the person certified copies of the contract, proposal, plans specifications, and bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 7; P.L. 1938, ch. 2644, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-8

.

37-12-9.
Payment into court by surety — Discharge.

The surety on the bond may pay into the registry of the court, for distribution among those who may be or become entitled thereto under the decree of the court, the penal sum named in the bond less any amount which the surety may have paid to the state in satisfaction of the liability of the surety to the state under the bond, and then shall be entitled to be discharged from all further liability under the bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2105, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 79, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

37-12-9

.

37-12-10.
Retainers relating to contracts for public works, sewer, or water main construction.

Upon substantial completion of the work required by a contract aggregating in amount less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, remodeling, repair, or improvement of sewers and water mains, or any public works project defined in §

37-13-1

, the awarding authority may deduct from its payment a retention to secure satisfactory performance of the contractual work not exceeding five percent (5%) of the contract price.

There shall also be deducted and retained from the contract price an additional sum sufficient to pay the estimated cost of municipal police traffic control on any public works project. Municipalities shall directly pay the officers working traffic details and shall bill and be reimbursed by the withholding authority for which the contract is being performed every thirty (30) days until the project is complete.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, with respect to projects located within the town of Warren, the withholding authority shall hold an amount from the contract price that shall be reasonably sufficient to pay the estimated cost of municipal police traffic control. The withholding authority shall pay to the town of Warren within seventy-two (72) hours of written demand the actual costs of police traffic control associated with said project on an ongoing basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 377, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 170, § 2.

37-12-10.1.
Contractor/subcontractor retainage.

No contract for construction, as defined in §

5-65-1

, or for state or municipal public works projects, as defined in this title, excluding contracts under §

37-12-10

, shall include retainage that exceeds five percent (5%) of any progress payment.

Not later than fourteen (14) days after reaching substantial completion, as defined in §

5-65-1

, the prime contractor shall submit to the project owner a notice of substantial completion, substantially in the form provided in this subsection, stating the date on which the project was substantially complete.

The project owner shall accept or reject the notice of substantial completion within fourteen (14) days of receipt of the notice. The project owner shall indicate its acceptance by signing the notice in the space provided, and shall deliver the notice to the prime contractor within the same fourteen-day (14) period. If the project owner fails to deliver the notice to the prime contractor within the fourteen-day (14) period, the notice shall be deemed accepted. If the project owner rejects the notice of substantial completion, the project owner shall, within fourteen (14) days of receipt of the notice described in subsection (b), notify the prime contractor in writing of the rejection, and include in the rejection the factual and contractual basis for the rejection, and a certification that the rejection is made in good faith. A rejection of the notice shall be subject to the dispute resolution provisions of the contract for construction, which, notwithstanding any provision in the contract to the contrary, shall be commenced by the prime contractor within seven (7) days of receipt of the rejection of the project owner. The prime contractor and project owner shall prosecute the dispute resolution procedures diligently, expeditiously, and in good faith. A notice of substantial completion not rejected by the project owner within fourteen (14) days of receipt of the notice and in accordance with this subsection shall be deemed accepted by the project owner. Upon an express or deemed acceptance of a notice of substantial completion, the date of substantial completion shall be the date stated in the prime contractor’s notice for all purposes, and the acceptance shall be final and binding on the project owner and its successors and assignees.

Not later than fourteen (14) days after the express or deemed acceptance of the notice of substantial completion or, in the case of a dispute, final and binding resolution of the dispute, the project owner shall submit to the prime contractor a written list describing all incomplete or defective work items and deliverables required of the prime contractor under the prime contractor’s contract for construction. The list shall be certified by the project owner as made in good faith. Not later than twenty-one (21) days after the express or deemed acceptance of the notice of substantial completion, or, in the case of a dispute, final and binding resolution of the dispute, the prime contractor shall submit to each person from whom the prime contractor is withholding retainage, a written list describing all incomplete or defective work items and deliverables required by the person under the person’s contract for construction, which list may include items beyond those on the project owner’s list. The list shall be certified by the prime contractor as made in good faith.

The project owner and prime contractor shall fulfill their obligations pursuant to subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section in good faith and in a timely manner. Except where the contract for construction shall provide for an earlier submission, following the expiration of sixty (60) days after substantial completion or, in the case of a dispute under subsection (c), final and binding resolution of the dispute, a person may submit a written application for payment of retainage in the form required by the person’s contract for construction. An application for payment of retainage shall be accompanied by a written list identifying the incomplete or defective work items and deliverables on its received list that the person has completed, repaired, and delivered. The list shall be certified by the person submitting the application for payment of retainage as made in good faith. Subject to subsection (f), an application for payment of retainage shall be paid not later than thirty (30) days following submission of the application, or on the next payment cycle in accordance with the established state revolving fund (SRF) payment schedule; provided, however, that the time period for payment of an application for retainage by the person at each tier of contract below the owner of the project may be extended by seven (7) days longer than the time period applicable to the person at the tier of contract above the person.

Not more than the following amounts may be withheld from the payment of retainage:

For unknown or foreseeable defects that may become known in the first year after substantial completion, one-half percent (1/2%) may be held for up to one year following the date of substantial completion;

For incomplete, incorrect, or missing deliverables, either the value of the deliverables as mutually agreed upon in writing by the parties to the contract for construction of the person seeking payment of retainage pursuant to the contract or if no value has been agreed upon in writing by the parties, the reasonable value of the deliverables which shall not exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the total adjusted contract price of the person seeking payment of retainage;

One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the reasonable cost to complete or correct incomplete or defective work items; and

The reasonable value of claims and any costs, expenses, and attorney’s fees incurred as a result of the claims if permitted in the contract for construction of the person seeking the payment of retainage. No amount shall be withheld from the payment of retainage unless the person seeking payment has received, before the date that the payment is due, a description, in writing, of the incomplete or defective work items and incomplete, incorrect, or missing deliverables, the factual and contractual basis for the claims, and the value attributable to each incomplete or defective work item, deliverable, and claim. The writing shall be certified as made in good faith. A person may submit additional applications for payment of retainage in the form required by the person’s contract for construction following completion or correction of incomplete or defective work items, the furnishing of deliverables, or the resolution of claims. The additional applications shall be paid, and amounts may be withheld from payment, in accordance with subsection (f).

Retainage held by the project owner on account of the prime contractor’s self-performed labor, materials, and equipment shall be eligible for payment to the same extent as if the labor, materials, and equipment had been provided by a person under a contract for construction with the prime contractor.

If the prime contractor has not been declared in default under the requirements of the contract for construction with the project owner and subject to this section, the project owner shall not withhold any part of the retainage of a person under a contract for construction with the prime contractor or the prime contractor’s proportional retainage calculated thereon for a claim that the project owner asserts against the prime contractor that is not based on the performance of the person or a default of the person’s contract for construction.

A contract for construction may establish the date of the month for submission of an application for payment of retainage; provided, however, that the contract may not restrict the submission to less frequently than one application per calendar month. An application submitted prior to the date established in the contract for construction shall be deemed submitted as of the date established in the contract. A rejection of an application for payment of retainage and a dispute regarding incomplete or defective work items, deliverables, or claims shall be subject to the applicable dispute resolution procedure. A provision in a contract for construction that requires a person to delay commencement of the applicable dispute resolution procedure for more than thirty (30) days after either the rejection of an application for payment of retainage or written notice of the dispute is provided, whichever first occurs, shall be void and unenforceable. The payment of retainage shall be subject to subsection (e).

A communication required by this section to be in writing may be submitted in electronic form and by electronic means.

A provision in a contract for construction that purports to waive, limit, or subvert this section or redefine or expand the conditions for achievement of substantial completion for payment of retainage shall be void and unenforceable.

Any contract under this section, as defined by §

37-13-1

, that exceeds twelve (12) months in duration shall allow those subcontractors who are substantially complete within the first third (1/3) of the project to request from the prime contractor release of retainage pursuant to subsections (b), (c), (d) and (e).

The Rhode Island department of transportation (RIDOT) shall be exempt from the provisions of this section and may deduct from any payments required pursuant to any construction contract an amount reasonably sufficient to secure satisfactory performance of contractual work which amount shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the contract price.

FORM FOR NOTICE OF SUBSTANTIAL COMPLETION NOTICE OF SUBSTANTIAL COMPLETION For [project name] To [project owner]: The undersigned hereby gives notice that the project was substantially complete, as defined under , or for state or municipal public works projects, as defined in title 37 of the general laws on [date of substantial completion]. This notice is certified as made in good faith on [date of notice]. §

5-65-1(20)

By [prime contractor] Accepted: By [project owner] Dated:

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 170, § 3.

37-12-11.
Substitution of securities for retained earnings.

Where any public works contract as defined by §

37-13-1

provides for the retention of earned estimates by the state of Rhode Island, the contractor may, from time to time, withdraw the whole or any portion of the amount retained for payments to the contractor pursuant to the terms of the contract, upon depositing with the general treasurer either;

United States treasury bonds, United States treasury notes, United States treasury certificates of indebtedness, or United States treasury bills;

Bonds or notes of the state of Rhode Island; or

Bonds of any political subdivision in the state of Rhode Island.

No amount shall be withdrawn in excess of the market value of the securities at the time of deposit or of the par value of the securities, whichever is lower. The general treasurer shall, on a regular basis, collect all interest or income on the obligations so deposited and shall pay the interest or income, when and as collected, to the contractor who deposited the obligations. If the deposit is in the form of coupon bonds, the general treasurer shall deliver each coupon as it matures to the contractor. Any amount deducted by the state, or by any public department or official thereof, pursuant to the terms of the contract, from the retained payments otherwise due the contractor, shall be deducted, first from that portion of the retained payments for which no security has been substituted, then from the proceeds of any deposited security. In the latter case, the contractor shall be entitled to receive interest, coupons, or income only from those securities which remain after the amount has been deducted. The securities so deposited shall be properly endorsed by the contractor in such manner so as to enable the general treasurer to carry out the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 140, § 1.